Utah statutes.
31A-8a-201.   License required.

(1)  Except as provided in Subsection 31A-8a-103(3), prior to operating or marketing a health discount program, a person shall:

(a)  be authorized to transact business in this state; and

(b)  be licensed by the commissioner.

(2) (a)  An application for licensure under this chapter shall be filed with the commissioner on a form prescribed by the commissioner.

(b)  The application shall be sworn to by an officer or authorized representative of the health discount program and shall include:

(i)  articles of incorporation with bylaws or other enabling documents that establish the organizational structure;

(ii)  information required by the commissioner by administrative rule which the commissioner determines is necessary to:

(A)  identify and locate principals, operators, and marketers involved with the health discount program; and

(B)  protect the interests of enrollees of health discount programs, health care providers, and consumers;

(iii)  biographical information, and when requested by the commissioner, a criminal background check, under the provisions of Subsection 31A-23a-105(3);

(iv)  the disclosures required in Section 31A-8a-203; and

(v)  the fee established in accordance with Section 31A-3-103.



Amended by Chapter 135, 2013 General Session

